Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Confidential Communications.

Sec. 18.66.200.
Compulsory disclosure of communications prohibited.

Except as provided in AS

18.66.210

or

18.66.220

, a victim or victim counselor may not be compelled, without appropriate consent, to give testimony or to produce records concerning confidential communications for any purpose in a criminal, civil, legislative, or administrative proceeding. In this subsection, “appropriate consent” means

the consent of the victim with respect to the testimony of

an adult victim; and

a victim counselor when the victim is an adult;

the consent of the victim’s parent, legal guardian, or guardian ad litem with respect to the testimony of a

victim who is a minor or incompetent to testify; and

victim counselor when the victim is a minor or incompetent to testify.

Either party may apply for appointment of a guardian ad litem for purposes of (a)(2) of this section.

A victim or victim counselor may not be compelled to provide testimony in a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding that would identify the name, address, location, or telephone number of a safe house, abuse shelter, or other facility that provided temporary emergency shelter to the victim of the offense or transaction that is the subject of the proceeding, or the name, address, or telephone number of a victim counselor, unless the court or hearing officer determines that the information is necessary and relevant to the facts of the case.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section,

a minor may waive the privilege provided under (a) of this section and testify or give consent for a victim counselor to testify if the court determines that the minor is capable of knowingly waiving the privilege;

a parent or legal guardian may not, on behalf of a minor, waive the privilege provided under (a) of this section with respect to the minor’s testimony or the testimony of a victim counselor if

the parent or legal guardian has been charged with a crime against the minor;

a protective order or restraining order has been entered against the parent or legal guardian on request of or on behalf of the minor; or

the parent or legal guardian otherwise has an interest adverse to that of the minor with respect to the waiver of privilege.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 25.35.052.
Renumbered as AS

25.35.100

in 1992. Renumbered again in 1996 under § 73, ch. 64, SLA 1996, at which time “AS

18.66.210

or

18.66.220

” was substituted for “AS 25.35.110 or 25.35.120” in subsection (a) to reflect the 1996 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 18.66.210.
Exceptions.

The privilege provided under AS

18.66.200

does not apply to

reports of suspected child abuse or neglect under AS 47.17;

evidence that the victim is about to commit a crime;

a proceeding that occurs after the victim’s death;

a communication relevant to an issue of breach by the victim or victim counselor of a duty arising out of the victim-victim counselor relationship;

a communication that is determined to be admissible hearsay as an excited utterance under the Alaska Rules of Evidence;

a child-in-need-of-aid proceeding under AS 47.10;

a communication made during the victim-victim counselor relationship if the services of the counselor were sought, obtained, or used to enable anyone to commit or plan a crime or to escape detection or apprehension after the commission of a crime; or

a criminal proceeding concerning criminal charges against a victim of domestic violence or sexual assault where the victim is charged with a crime

under AS 11.41 against a minor; or

in which the physical, mental, or emotional condition of the victim is raised in defense of the victim.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 25.35.054.
Renumbered as AS 25.35.110 in 1992. Renumbered again in 1996 under § 73, ch. 64, SLA 1996, at which time “AS

18.66.200

” was substituted for “AS

25.35.100

” to reflect the 1996 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 18.66.220.
Waiver.

A victim does not waive the protections provided in AS

18.66.200

by testifying except that, if the victim partially discloses the contents of a confidential communication in the course of testifying in a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding, then either party may request the court or hearing officer to rule that justice requires the protections of AS

18.66.200

to be waived to the extent they apply to that portion of the communication. A waiver under this subsection applies only to the extent necessary to require a witness to respond to counsel’s questions concerning the confidential communications that were disclosed and only to the extent that they are relevant to the facts of the case.

A victim counselor may not waive the protections afforded to a victim under AS

18.66.200

without the consent of the victim or the consent of a parent, legal guardian, or guardian ad litem authorized to give consent under AS

18.66.200

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 25.35.056.
Renumbered as AS 25.35.120 in 1992. Renumbered again in 1996 under § 73, ch. 64, SLA 1996, at which time “AS

18.66.200

” was substituted for “AS

25.35.100

” in two places in subsection (a) and two places in subsection (b) to reflect the 1996 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 18.66.230.
Inference from claim of privilege; instruction.

The claim of a privilege under AS

18.66.200

, whether in a present proceeding or upon a prior occasion, is not a proper subject of comment by a judge, hearing officer, legislator, or counsel. An inference may not be drawn from the claim of privilege.

In jury cases, proceedings shall be conducted, to the extent practicable, so as to facilitate the making of a claim of privilege under AS

18.66.200

without the knowledge of the jury.

Upon request, a party against whom a jury might draw an adverse inference from a claim of privilege under AS

18.66.200

is entitled to an instruction that an inference may not be drawn from the claim of privilege.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 25.35.058.
Renumbered as AS 25.35.130 in 1992. Renumbered again in 1996 under § 73, ch. 64, SLA 1996, at which time “AS

18.66.200

” was substituted for “AS

25.35.100

” in subsections (a), (b) and (c) to reflect the 1996 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 18.66.250.
Definitions.

In AS

18.66.200

—

18.66.250

,

“confidential communication” means information exchanged between a victim and a victim counselor in private or in the presence of a third party who is necessary to facilitate communication or further the counseling process and that is disclosed in the course of victim counseling resulting from a sexual assault or domestic violence;

“sexual assault” means an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

or an offense in another jurisdiction whose elements are similar to the elements of an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

;

“victim” means a person who consults a victim counselor for assistance in overcoming adverse effects of a sexual assault or domestic violence;

“victim counseling” means support, assistance, advice, or treatment to alleviate the adverse effects of a sexual assault or domestic violence on the victim;

“victim counseling center” means a private organization, an organization operated by or contracted by a branch of the armed forces of the United States, or a local government agency that

has, as one of its primary purposes, the provision of direct services to victims for trauma resulting from a sexual assault or domestic violence;

is not affiliated with a law enforcement agency or a prosecutor’s office; and

is not on contract with the state to provide services under AS 47;

“victim counselor” means an employee or supervised volunteer of a victim counseling center that provides counseling to victims

who has undergone a minimum of 40 hours of training in domestic violence or sexual assault, crisis intervention, victim support, treatment and related areas; or

whose duties include victim counseling.

History.

(§ 3 ch 95 SLA 1992; am § 28 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 25.35.059.
Renumbered as AS 25.35.150 in 1992. Renumbered again in 1996 under § 73, ch. 64, SLA 1996, at which time “AS

18.66.200

—

18.66.250

” was substituted for “AS

25.35.100

— 25.35.150” in the introductory language to reflect the 1996 renumbering of those sections.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(b), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to paragraph (5) apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2013.